Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 1 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
43-1-117.5. Transit and rail division - created - powers and duties - pilot project to expand transit - report - repeal.

There is hereby created in the department of transportation the transit and rail division, the head of which shall be the director of the transit and rail division, which office is hereby created.

The transit and rail division and the office of the director of the division are type 2 entities, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercise their powers and perform their duties and functions under the department and the executive director.

The transit and rail division shall be responsible for the planning, development, operation, and integration of transit and rail, including, where appropriate, advanced guideway systems, into the statewide transportation system; shall, in coordination with other transit and rail providers, plan, promote, and implement investments in transit and rail services statewide; and shall have the following specific powers and duties:

To develop, in accordance with part 11 of this article and consistent with the requirements of 23 U.S.C. secs. 134 and 135, a statewide transit and passenger rail plan that shall be integrated by the department as an element of the statewide transportation plan. The plan shall identify local, interregional, and statewide transit and passenger rail needs and priorities.

To promote, plan, design, build, finance, operate, maintain, and contract for transit services, including, but not limited to, bus, passenger rail, and advanced guideway systems services;

To establish and modify fares and schedules for transit, passenger rail, and advanced guideway services provided directly by the state or contracted for by the state;

To administer and expend state and federal funds that may be dedicated by law, by appropriation by the general assembly, or by the commission for:

The construction, maintenance, and operation of interregional transit, advanced guideway, and passenger rail services; and

Transit projects including, but not limited to, facilities, equipment, services, and the provision of grants to transit operators;

To coordinate and negotiate with railroads regarding the siting of passenger rail tracks and other facilities and the coordination of transit services;

To support the department in representing the state with respect to the development of intercity rail facilities, including but not limited to submission of applications to the United States department of transportation for approval and funding of high-speed rail projects, commissioning of any necessary studies, and coordination with other states to facilitate such applications; and

To coordinate and cooperate with regional transportation authorities created pursuant to part 6 of article 4 of this title and other regional or corridor-specific entities concerned with the planning, development, operation, and integration of transit, passenger rail, or advanced guideway systems in the statewide transportation system.

In exercising the powers and performing the duties set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the transit and rail division shall coordinate with the regional transportation district created in article 9 of title 32, C.R.S., regional transportation authorities created pursuant to part 6 of article 4 of this title, and other transit operators to ensure the efficient provision of transit services. The authority given to the division pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall not be construed to limit or otherwise affect the powers of any transit operator or other local governmental entity or to usurp or duplicate the existing regulatory authority over railroads of the federal railroad administration, the federal surface transportation board, or the public utilities commission.

The transit and rail division shall establish a pilot project, beginning no later than July 1, 2022, and concluding on June 30, 2025, for the extension of state-run transit systems. The goals of the pilot project are to increase ridership on state-run transit, reduce vehicle miles traveled in the state, and reduce ground level ozone in the state.

On or before December 1, 2023, and on or before December 1 of each year through 2025, the transit and rail division shall report to the transportation legislation review committee created in section 43-2-145 on the implementation of the pilot project, including information on the services that are expanded or extended and estimates of the increased ridership as a result of the pilot project.

Three days after May 26, 2022, the state treasurer shall transfer thirty million dollars from the general fund to the state highway fund created in section 43-1-219 for use by the transit and rail division for the purposes specified in this subsection (4).

This subsection (4) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-094), ch. 280, p. 1250, § 3, effective May 20.

L. 2022:

(4) added, (SB 22-180), ch. 236, p. 1741, § 4, effective May 26; (2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3432, § 222, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in SB 22-180, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

(2) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

43-1-118. Employees - duties.

All employees of the department not otherwise provided for in this part 1 shall be employed and shall serve pursuant to the constitution and laws of the state. They shall have such powers and shall perform such duties as may be assigned to them by the chief engineer, by the executive director, or by the director of their respective divisions.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1041, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-109 as it existed prior to 1991.

43-1-119. Applications for licenses - authority to suspend licenses - rules.

Every application by an individual for a license issued by the department or any authorized agent of the department shall require the applicant's name, address, and social security number.

The department or any authorized agent of the department shall deny, suspend, or revoke any license pursuant to the provisions of section 26-13-126, C.R.S., and any rules promulgated in furtherance thereof, if the department or agent thereof receives a notice to deny, suspend, or revoke from the state child support enforcement agency because the licensee or applicant is out of compliance with a court or administrative order for current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, or child support when combined with maintenance or because the licensee or applicant has failed to comply with a properly issued subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity or child support proceeding. Any such denial, suspension, or revocation shall be in accordance with the procedures specified by rule of the department, rules promulgated by the state board of human services, and any memorandum of understanding entered into between the department or an authorized agent thereof and the state child support enforcement agency for the implementation of this section and section 26-13-126, C.R.S.

The department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the state child support enforcement agency, which memorandum shall identify the relative responsibilities of the department and the state child support enforcement agency in the department of human services with respect to the implementation of this section and section 26-13-126, C.R.S.

The appropriate rule-making body of the department is authorized to promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

For purposes of this section, "license" means any recognition, authority, or permission that the department or any authorized agent of such department is authorized by law to issue for an individual to practice a profession or occupation or for an individual to participate in any recreational activity. "License" may include, but is not necessarily limited to, any license, certificate, certification, letter of authorization, or registration issued for an individual to practice a profession or occupation or for an individual to participate in any recreational activity.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1311, § 48, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

43-1-120. Bicycle and pedestrian policy - codification - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

It is in the best interest of all Coloradans to promote transportation mode choice by enhancing safety and mobility for bicyclists and pedestrians on or along the state highway system;

The department has adopted a bike and pedestrian policy directive to further this goal; and

It is necessary and appropriate to elevate the status of the bike and pedestrian policy of the department to that of law by codifying it in subsection (2) of this section.

The department and its subdivisions shall provide transportation infrastructure that accommodates bicycle and pedestrian use of public streets in a manner that is safe and reliable for all users of public streets.

The needs of bicyclists and pedestrians shall be included in the planning, design, and operation of transportation facilities as a matter of routine.

Any decision of the department to not accommodate the needs of bicyclists and pedestrians shall be documented based on exemption criteria that were established by the commission before the decision was made.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1147), ch. 422, p. 2185, § 2, effective July 1.

43-1-121. Interstate 70 mountain corridor - recommendation regarding short-term mobility solutions.

On or before December 20, 2011, the department shall make prioritized recommendations to the transportation committees of the house of representatives and the senate regarding actions that can be taken on or before July 1, 2014, to improve mobility in the interstate 70 mountain corridor. Each recommendation shall include an estimate of the amount of funding required to implement the recommendation and shall recommend available or potentially available sources of such funding. In developing its recommendations, the department shall consider operational and safety improvement options, transit options, and traffic demand management options and shall investigate the feasibility of nongovernmental actions that might improve mobility in the corridor.

The department shall consult with interested local governments and business entities that are located within the interstate 70 mountain corridor or that have governmental or business interests that are likely to be substantially affected by any actions taken to improve mobility in the corridor and shall take such consultation into account when developing the recommendations required by subsection (1) of this section. The department may also hold public hearings at which interested members of the public may propose actions to improve mobility in the corridor or comment on any such actions proposed by others.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1210), ch. 82, p. 221, § 1, effective August 10.

43-1-122. Removal of graffiti from departmental facilities - memorandums of understanding.

The department may, at its discretion, enter into a memorandum of understanding with any city, county, city and county, or other municipality of the state to allow the city, county, city and county, or other municipality to remove graffiti as needed from departmental property located within the city, county, city and county, or other municipality.

A memorandum of understanding entered into by the department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall state that if the city, county, city and county, or other municipality chooses to remove graffiti from a departmental facility, the city, county, city and county, or other municipality shall do so at its own expense.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (SB 11-256), ch. 254, p. 1101, § 4, effective August 10.

43-1-123. Project closure and project reporting requirements.

The department shall close each transportation project and release any money budgeted for the project as quickly as feasible and within one year following the substantial completion of the project unless a pending legal claim relating to the project or an unusual circumstance beyond the control of the department unavoidably requires a longer time to close the project.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, for transportation projects for which the department awards a competitively bid contract on or after July 1, 2016, the department shall report on its public website within thirty days of the contract award:

The identity of the winning bidder;

The amount of the winning bid; and

Whether or not the bid awarded was the low bid, and, if not, why the department chose the bid over a lower bid.

No later than November 1, 2017, and no later than November 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall report to the transportation commission regarding the percentages and total amount of money budgeted and expended during the preceding fiscal year for:

Payments to private sector contractors for work on transportation projects; and

Total transportation project costs for projects completed by department employees, including indirect cost recoveries and employee salaries.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-122), ch. 91, p. 255, § 2, effective April 14.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1417, § 114, effective May 25; (4) amended, (SB 17-231), ch. 174, p. 634, § 3, effective August 9.

43-1-124. Study of transportation commission districts.

No later than August 1, 2016, legislative council staff, with the cooperation of the department, shall prepare and present to the transportation legislation review committee a research study of the commission districts established in section 43-1-106 (2). The study must document changes since the last time the general assembly modified the number and boundaries of the commission districts, including changes in population, number of lane miles, and annual vehicle miles traveled for each of the districts and must take into account existing county and municipal boundaries, regional transportation authorities and districts, and transportation planning regions.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1031), ch. 323, p. 1309, § 1, effective June 10.

43-1-125. Motor vehicles used for commercial purposes - stakeholder group - reporting - rules - legislative declaration - definition.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The way in which Coloradans travel is rapidly changing, and the adoption of new technologies impacts both the manner in which people travel and the number of vehicles on Colorado roads, presents opportunities for increased efficiency, and requires thorough review;

The state must adapt to these changes by encouraging them to the extent that they benefit the environment and facilitate the effective movement of people while being proactive in addressing any negative impacts. Specifically, the state must:

Ensure ongoing funding for the transportation infrastructure needed to support the changes, including the infrastructure needed to support the adoption of new transportation technologies including zero-emissions vehicles; and

Reduce and mitigate the impact on the environment and the transportation system resulting from the increasing commercial use of personal vehicles for the purposes of ride sharing provided through transportation network companies, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3), and car sharing and personal and fleet vehicles for certain other commercial purposes by incentivizing ameliorative practices such as the adoption of zero-emissions vehicles for such commercial use, multiple passenger ride sharing, and the use of ride sharing as a first- and last-mile solution for users of public transit.

The general assembly further finds and declares that it is necessary, appropriate, and in the best interest of the state to:

Require the department to convene, engage in robust consultation with, and strongly consider the formal policy recommendations of a stakeholder group comprised of representatives of potentially affected industries, workers, governmental entities, planning organizations, and interest groups for the purposes of:

Examining the economic, environmental, and transportation system impacts of the adoption of new and emerging technologies and transportation business models;

Receiving information and recommendations from the freight advisory council regarding current and evolving practices related to the residential delivery of goods; and

Recommending to the department:

Means of addressing the impacts that increase positive impacts and mitigate negative impacts; and

Whether fees should be levied upon the use of motor vehicles used for commercial purposes.

Repealed.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "motor vehicle used for commercial purposes" means a motor vehicle that is used to provide passenger transportation services purchased through a transportation network company, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3), a peer-to-peer car sharing company, a car sharing company that does not use a peer-to-peer business model, or a company that provides taxicab service, as defined in section 40-10.1-101 (19); a motor vehicle that is rented out by a rental car company; and a motor vehicle that is used for residential delivery of goods.

"Motor vehicle used for commercial purposes" does not include:

A motor vehicle used to deliver goods that is used only to deliver goods:

To addresses other than residences; or

That are delivered as freight;

A motor vehicle that has a gross vehicle weight rating of more than fourteen thousand pounds; or

A motor vehicle that is operated for the purpose of transporting passengers:

Under a contract with the regional transportation district created in section 32-9-105, a regional transportation authority created pursuant to part 6 of article 4 of this title 43, or any other governmental or public entity; or

By a common carrier, as defined in section 40-1-102 (3), except as otherwise provided in subsection (3)(a) of this section.

The department shall convene and engage in robust consultation with a stakeholder group consisting of:

The following state government employees:

An employee of the department who is not an employee of the high-performance transportation enterprise created in section 43-4-806 (2)(a)(I);

An employee of the Colorado energy office created in section 24-38.5-101 (1);

An employee of the department of revenue; and

The chief of the Colorado state patrol or the chief's designee;

The following representatives of state and local governments and transportation planning entities:

A representative of a statewide organization that represents the interests of counties;

A representative of a statewide organization that represents the interests of municipalities;

A representative of metropolitan planning organizations, as defined in section 43-1-1102 (4); and

A representative of rural transportation planning organizations;

Representatives of the following types of businesses:

Two representatives of transportation network companies, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3);

A representative of a business that has expertise regarding the technology and processes required to develop, implement, and administer a road usage charge program;

A representative of certificated taxi carriers;

A representative of a rental car company;

A representative of a business that is a peer-to-peer car sharing program;

A representative of a car sharing network company that does not use a peer-to-peer car sharing business model;

A representative of the freight advisory council;

A representative of the contracting industry that works on or represents businesses that work on transportation infrastructure projects;

A representative of the engineering industry;

A representative of businesses that provide package delivery services to end users of the goods in the packages for other businesses;

A representative of businesses that hire drivers to use their personal motor vehicles to deliver their own goods to end users of the goods;

A representative of towing and recovery professionals of Colorado;

A representative of autonomous vehicle manufacturers; and

A representative of autonomous vehicle technology companies;

A labor representative;

A representative of persons with disabilities;

A representative of persons who advocate for the protection of the environment;

A transportation network company driver, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (4); and

Any other individuals who the department deems necessary or appropriate to include in the stakeholder group.

The stakeholder group convened as required by subsection (4) of this section shall:

Examine the economic, environmental, and transportation system impacts of the adoption of new and emerging transportation technologies and business models and identify potential means of addressing the impacts that increase positive impacts and mitigate negative impacts. Neither the department nor the stakeholder group shall obtain or examine any personal or private information concerning users of ride sharing services as part of the examination. The examination shall include, at a minimum:

Quantification of the amount of carbon emissions that can be eliminated through different means of incentivizing and supporting the use of zero-emissions vehicles as motor vehicles used for commercial purposes;

Examination of the effects of different means of incentivizing multiple occupant trips in motor vehicles used for commercial purposes;

Identification of the additional or improved transportation infrastructure, including multimodal infrastructure and infrastructure needed to support the adoption and use of zero-emissions vehicles, that is required to accommodate the impacts on transportation infrastructure resulting from utilization of motor vehicles used for commercial purposes;

Examination of repealing the requirement of section 40-10.1-605 (1)(d)(IV) that a transportation network company, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3), possess proof that a transportation network company driver, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (4), is medically fit to drive; and

Assessment of the costs of implementing identified potential means of addressing the impacts.

Present to the department no later than November 1, 2019, a report of policy recommendations regarding the impacts examined as required by subsection (5)(a) of this section and means of addressing those impacts with funding from the imposition of fees on the use of motor vehicles used for commercial purposes. The report must, at a minimum:

Identify potential fees to:

Generate sufficient revenue for the state and local governments to mitigate the impacts to the transportation system resulting from the increasing use of motor vehicles used for commercial purposes, fund needed transportation infrastructure, including multimodal infrastructure and the infrastructure needed to support the adoption of zero-emissions vehicles, and defray the administrative costs of fee collection;

Incentivize the adoption of zero-emissions vehicles for utilization as motor vehicles used for commercial purposes; and

Incentivize multiple passenger ride sharing for motor vehicles used for commercial purposes and the use of such vehicles as a first- and last-mile solution for public transit users;

Subject to the requirement that fees be imposed only on business entities and not upon individuals using motor vehicles that are owned primarily as personal vehicles but are also used for commercial purposes, provide recommendations as to whether fees should be imposed on such motor vehicles used for commercial purposes;

Provide recommendations regarding the manner in which fees should be calculated and imposed, including but not limited to analysis of whether fees should be:

Flat or variable;

Calculated and imposed on a per trip basis, a mileage basis, or a combination of such bases, or in some other manner;

Imposed at different rates on different classes of motor vehicles;

Imposed at different rates in different locations, at different times of day, or based on real-time analysis of traffic congestion;

Waived or reduced for trips for which a motor vehicle used for commercial purposes is used as a first- and last-mile solution for users of public transit; or

Capped at one or more specified maximum amounts; and

Provide recommendations regarding the rate or rates at which or the range or ranges of rates within which fees should be imposed.

The department shall report on the progress and policy recommendations of the stakeholder group, the preliminary plans and recommendations of the department regarding the development and promulgation of rules as required by subsection (7)(a) of this section, and any recommendations that the department has regarding the need for related legislation during its 2019 annual presentation to legislative oversight committees required by section 2-7-203 (2)(a). In preparation for the presentation, the department shall give strong consideration to the policy recommendations report provided by the stakeholder group as required by subsection (5)(b) of this section.

Repealed.

Nothing in this section shall supplant the activities or work being conducted by the freight advisory council.

Source: L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-239), ch. 387, p. 3448, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2020:

(2)(b) and (7) repealed, (HB 20-1376), ch. 207, p. 1016, § 4, effective June 30.

Cross references:

For information about the freight advisory council, see https://www.codot.gov/programs/planning/planning-partners/fac.

43-1-126. Public awareness of laws concerning operation of vehicle in vicinity of emergency vehicle.

The executive director or the executive director's designee shall coordinate with the chief of the Colorado state patrol to jointly create a campaign raising public awareness of the requirements of section 42-4-705 and of the dangers of stationary emergency and service vehicles that are on the road or on the side of the road.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1145), ch. 107, p. 421, § 3, effective September 14.

43-1-127. Registration of carpooling service internet applications - limitations - disclosure - definitions.

On and after October 1, 2021, an owner of a carpooling service internet application or an operator of the application on the owner's behalf shall register with the department on an annual basis in a form and manner determined by the department. The department shall publish the form and manner of registering on the department's public website. In registering with the department, the owner or operator of an application agrees that the owner or operator shall:

With respect to a single trip for which a driver and user are matched through the carpooling service internet application:

Compensate the driver up to the total rate of reimbursement based on miles driven multiplied by the prevailing federal internal revenue service's mileage reimbursement rate for business use;

Require each user to pay an equal amount of the fee for carpooling service, which fee shall be reasonably calculated to cover the direct and indirect costs of providing the carpooling service; and

Not allow a driver who provides carpooling service for the owner's or operator's carpooling service internet application to transport more than six passengers at a time, excluding the driver, in the driver's personal vehicle;

Limit each driver to one trip per day; and

Disclose to users in a conspicuous manner on the carpooling service internet application the following disclaimer:

The department is not liable for any act or omission of an owner or operator of a carpooling service internet application, an agent of an owner or operator, a driver, or a user.

Reimbursed costs collected in accordance with this section shall not be deemed compensation for any purpose.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Carpooling service" means a not-for-profit arrangement in which two or more individuals use a motor vehicle for transportation to, and possibly returning from, the same destination or nearby destinations.

"Carpooling service" includes, for each user or passenger:

A trip that is at least twenty-three miles between pick-up and drop-off points, whether the pick-up and drop-off points are located within or outside metropolitan areas; and

A trip that is to or from a ski area, as that term is defined in section 33-44-103 (6), regardless of the distance between the ski area and the other location.

"Carpooling service" does not include a transportation arrangement made with:

A political subdivision, as defined in section 29-1-202 (2);

A common carrier, contract carrier, taxicab service, large-market taxicab service, or towing carrier, as those terms are defined in section 40-10.1-101;

A charter bus, children's activity bus, fire crew transport, luxury limousine service, or off-road scenic charter, as those terms are defined in section 40-10.1-301; or

A transportation network company, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3).

"Carpooling service internet application" or "application" means an internet application or digital network used to connect drivers and users:

For the purpose of facilitating carpooling service; and

Through which reservations for carpooling service are made no less than two hours in advance of, and are usually made at least one day in advance of, the carpooling service.

"Driver" means an individual who uses a vehicle that the individual personally owns or leases and who provides carpooling services to users in that vehicle through use of a carpooling service internet application.

"Metropolitan area" means a metropolitan planning area designated by agreement of a governor and a metropolitan planning organization, as those terms are defined in 49 U.S.C. sec. 5302 (8) and 49 U.S.C. sec. 5303 (b)(1) and (b)(2) of the "Federal Transit Act", as amended.

"Metropolitan area" does not include any ski area, as that term is defined in section 33-44-103 (6).

"Trip" means a single round trip that a driver makes to provide carpooling service to one or more users, involving one or more pick-up locations and one or more drop-off destinations along the way, during which all intentional stops that the driver makes relate to the provision of carpooling service to the users and any other passengers in a user's party.

"User" means an individual who is matched with a driver through a carpooling service internet application to receive carpooling service for the user and for any other passengers in the user's party.

Be advised that carpooling service companies are not regulated by the state of Colorado. Background checks might not be performed on drivers, drivers are not subject to medical examination and certification, vehicles are not subject to inspection by the state, and state insurance verification is not performed.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1076), ch. 44, p. 187, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 2022:

(4)(a)(III)(C) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2988, § 94, effective August 10.

43-1-128. Environmental impacts of capacity projects - additional requirements - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Transportation capacity projects that are intended to alleviate traffic congestion, address mobility, and improve travel time reliability by increasing the capacity of highways in major transportation corridors can cause adverse environmental impacts, including but not limited to incremental acceleration of climate change, and adverse health impacts;

These impacts fall most heavily on communities adjacent to projects, including disproportionately impacted communities;

To minimize the adverse environmental and health impacts of planned transportation capacity projects and address inequitable distribution of the burdens of such projects, it is necessary, appropriate, and in the best interests of the state and all Coloradans to require the department and metropolitan planning organizations, which are the state's primary transportation planning entities with responsibility for selecting and funding transportation capacity projects, to engage in an enhanced level of planning, modeling and other analysis, community engagement, and monitoring with respect to such projects as required by this section; and

The requirements of this section are in addition to and shall to the extent practicable be executed concurrently with, and do not supplant, any other requirements or processes, including federal safety and state of good repair requirements, for transportation planning, project prioritization, public outreach, project implementation, or transparency and accountability that are established by law, rule, or commission or department policy.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Air pollutant" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25-7-103 (1.5).

"Criteria pollutant" means carbon monoxide, ground-level ozone, lead, nitrogen dioxide, particulate matter, and sulfur dioxide.

"Disproportionately impacted community" means a community that is in a census block group, as determined in accordance with the most recent United States decennial census, where the proportion of households that are low income is greater than forty percent, the proportion of households that identify as minority is greater than forty percent, or the proportion of households that are housing cost-burdened is greater than forty percent.

As used in this subsection (2)(c):

"Cost-burdened" means a household that spends more than thirty percent of its income on housing.

"Low income" means the median household income is less than or equal to two hundred percent of the federal poverty guideline.

"Greenhouse gas pollutants" means anthropogenic emissions of carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, nitrogen trifluoride, and sulfur hexafluoride.

"Statewide greenhouse gas pollution" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25-7-103 (22.5).

Effective as of July 1, 2022, the department shall establish and propose to the commission for its review implementing procedures and guidelines that require the department and metropolitan planning organizations to take additional steps in the planning process for regionally significant transportation capacity projects to account for the impacts on the amount of statewide greenhouse gas pollution and statewide vehicle miles traveled that are expected to result from such projects. Such guidelines and procedures shall apply to adoption of the next ten-year plan and subsequent planning cycles and shall fully evaluate the potential environmental and health impacts on disproportionately impacted communities. The commission shall, with such modifications as the commission may make subject to the requirements of this section and with opportunities for public involvement, adopt the procedures and guidelines. At a minimum, both the proposed and adopted procedures and guidelines must require the department and metropolitan planning organizations to:

Implement relevant rules and regulations issued pursuant to section 25-7-105;

Otherwise reduce greenhouse gas emissions to help achieve the statewide greenhouse gas pollution reduction targets established in section 25-7-102 (2)(g);

Modify their guidance documents to ensure that at least the same level of analytical scrutiny is given to greenhouse gas pollutants as is given to other air pollutants of concern in the state including consideration of the impact on emissions of greenhouse gas pollutants of induced demand resulting from regionally significant transportation capacity projects alongside traffic modeling; and

Consider the role of land use in the transportation planning process and develop strategies to encourage land use decisions that reduce vehicle miles traveled and greenhouse gas emissions.

If a planned transportation capacity project is a regionally significant project, as determined by the department with consideration given to federal law or regulations that define or describe such projects, the department shall, through its environmental study process:

Use federal environmental protection agency-approved models to determine air pollutant emission impacts for the planned project and provide monitoring and measurement of criteria pollutants prior to construction;

Develop and implement a particulate matter construction plan to provide continuous monitoring and transparent public reporting of concentrations, public alerts issued as soon as possible when exceedance events occur, and action plans to address emission levels on construction projects prior to exceedances, with particular focus on disproportionately impacted communities; and

Develop and implement a plan to mitigate air quality impacts on communities, including but not limited to disproportionately impacted communities adjacent to the project, with particular focus where feasible on mitigation of fine particulate matter pollution.

With the exception of the interstate highway 270 corridor improvement project, the requirements of subsections (4)(a) and (4)(c) of this section do not apply to any projects that have, on or before July 1, 2022, a signed record of decision, finding of no significant impact, or categorical exclusions as provided by the federal "National Environmental Policy Act of 1969", 42 U.S.C. sec. 4321 et seq.

To promote transparency and increase both public participation and public confidence in regionally significant transportation capacity project selection, planning, and implementation in communities, including but not limited to disproportionately impacted communities, the department shall, with opportunity for public input, review, update, and improve as necessary its public engagement program for planned transportation capacity projects. In doing so, the department shall create diverse and impactful ways to gather input from communities across the state by communicating in multiple languages and multiple formats and transparently sharing readily understandable information about potential adverse impacts, including but not limited to environmental and health impacts, of potential transportation capacity projects.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1412, § 30, effective June 17.

L. 2022:

(5) amended, (SB 22-141), ch. 81, p. 399, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.